Hawaii statutes.
§382-1 Definitions. As used in this
chapter unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:

"Company" and "stevedoring
company" mean any persons engaged in the stevedoring industry as an
employer whether in the business of furnishing stevedoring services or related
services or both.

"Employee" means any person employed
by an employer.

"Employer" means any person who
employs the services of employees in the stevedoring industry, but shall not
include the State or any agency thereof.

"Industrial dispute" and "labor
dispute" mean any controversy concerning wages, hours, or other terms or
conditions of employment, or concerning the association or representation of
persons in negotiating, fixing, maintaining, changing, or seeking to arrange
wages, hours, or other terms or conditions of employment.

"Labor organization" means any
organization of employees which exists for the purpose, in whole or in part, of
collective bargaining or of dealing with employers concerning wages, hours, and
other terms and conditions of employment.

"Lockout" means the refusal of an
employer to furnish work to employees as the result of a labor dispute between
the employer and its employees.

"Person" includes one or more
individuals, labor organizations, partnerships, associations, corporations,
legal representatives, trustees, or receivers.

"Related services" means and includes
all services, other than stevedoring services, ordinarily or necessarily
performed in regard to cargo, goods, wares, and merchandise of every kind arriving
at a terminal facility for shipment by or discharge from vessels and other
craft; and "related facilities" means and includes all facilities in
connection therewith.

"Stevedoring industry" means the
business of furnishing services for the loading and unloading of cargo
transported or to be transported on vessels and other craft, at any ports
within the State, and also means the business of furnishing related services,
as herein defined.

"Stevedoring services" means services
for the loading and unloading of cargo transported or to be transported on
vessels and other craft and the handling of lines of vessels and other craft,
at any ports within the State.

"Strike" means the temporary stoppage
of work, slowdown, or retarding of production or operations by the concerted
action of employees.

"Terminal facility" means any dock,
wharf, pier, quay, bulkhead, or landing, with the appurtenances thereto, and
any warehouse used in connection therewith. [L 1951, c 209, §2; RL 1955, §92-2;
HRS §382-1]

Revision Note

Numeric designations deleted and definitions rearranged
pursuant to §23G-15.

Case Notes

"Labor dispute" referred to. 46 H. 140, 377 P.2d
715 (1962).

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next